West Virginia, session 2026, HB4850.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVES. §44-1-1a. Online educational training for executors. Beginning January 1, 2028, the West Virginia State Bar shall make available on its official website educational materials concerning the administration of wills and estates, covering the duties and responsibilities of executors and administrators, including acting as a fiduciary. The materials shall be available to the public without charge, displayed in a conspicuous and easily accessible location on the State Bar’s website, and accessible to individuals with sight-impairment.  The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home